Utah statutes.
17-50-312.   Acquisition, management, and disposal of property.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (4), a county may purchase, receive, hold, sell, lease, convey, or otherwise acquire and dispose of any real or personal property or any interest in such property if the action is in the public interest and complies with other law.

(2)  Any property interest acquired by the county shall be held in the name of the county unless specifically otherwise provided by law.

(3)  The county legislative body shall provide by ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation for the manner in which property shall be acquired, managed, and disposed of.

(4) (a)  Before a county may dispose of a significant parcel of real property, the county shall:

(i)  provide reasonable notice of the proposed disposition at least 14 days before the opportunity for public comment under Subsection (4)(a)(ii); and

(ii)  allow an opportunity for public comment on the proposed disposition.

(b)  Each county shall, by ordinance, define what constitutes:

(i)  a significant parcel of real property for purposes of Subsection (4)(a); and

(ii)  reasonable notice for purposes of Subsection (4)(a)(i).

